New York, session 2025-2026, A8946.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 365-a of the social services law, 2 as amended by chapter 484 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 6. (a) Any inconsistent provision of law notwithstanding, medical 5 assistance shall also include payment for medical care, services or 6 supplies furnished to eligible pregnant women pursuant to [paragraph (o) 7 of subdivision four of section three hundred sixty-six] subparagraphs 8 two and four of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of section three 9 hundred sixty-six and subdivision six of section three hundred sixty- 10 four-i of this title, to the extent that and for so long as federal 11 financial participation is available therefor, except that this shall 12 not apply to the medical assistance described in paragraph (b) of this 13 subdivision; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be 14 deemed to affect payment for such medical care, services or supplies if 15 federal financial participation is not available for such care, services 16 and supplies solely by reason of the immigration status of the otherwise 17 eligible pregnant woman. 18 (b) Medical assistance shall also include payment for medical care, 19 services or supplies to monitor blood pressure that have been validated 20 for accuracy and are furnished without prior authorization to eligible 21 pregnant women pursuant to subparagraphs two and four of paragraph (b) 22 of subdivision one of section three hundred sixty-six and subdivision 23 six of section three hundred sixty-four-i of this title. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13370-01-5